District of Columbia statutes.
20-910

Meeting of creditors.

A personal representative may convene, on a day designated by the Court, a meeting of all creditors whose claims have been duly presented pursuant to section 20-905 . The personal representative shall give written notice to all such creditors of the time, date, place and purpose of the meeting which shall be held not less than 10 days from the date of the notice. The Court shall deny or approve any claim in whole or in part at the meeting. The payment of any claim as approved by Court order shall hold harmless the personal representative acting in obedience to it, subject to any perfected appeal.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-910.